Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-804 Security interest unperfected
before July 1, 2013. A security interest that is an unperfected security
interest prior to July 1, 2013, shall be a perfected security interest:

(1) Without further action, if, on or before July 1,
2013, the applicable requirements for perfection under this article are
satisfied; or

(2) Upon satisfaction of the applicable requirements
for perfection. [L 2012, c 33, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next